South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4402.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Suspends Section 58-3-20(C) for 2025-2026 SECTION 1.    The provision prohibiting the General Assembly from holding an election until a final determination is made by the courts regarding its review of congressional districts' compliance with statutory or constitutional requirements of Section 58-3-20(C) of the S.C. Code is suspended for Calendar Years 2025 and 2026. Suspends Section 2-20-15 for PSC member elections for 2025-2026 SECTION 2.    Section 2-20-15 of the S.C. Code shall not apply to elections for members of the Public Service Commission conducted by the General Assembly during Calendar Years 2025 and 2026. Time effective SECTION 3.    This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 8th day of May, 2025. Approved the 12th day of May, 2025. __________